Illinois, session 104th, HB4787.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 5-70 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-70 new)7    Sec. 5-70. Brain injury waiver services.8    (a) Findings. The General Assembly finds that:9        (1) Annually, over 141,000 new brain injuries are 10    sustained by children and adult Illinois residents.11        (2) The State provides services and support for 12    individuals with brain injuries through the Persons with 13    Brain Injury waiver, which is part of the Home and 14    Community-Based Services Waiver and is operated by the 15    Department of Human Services' Division of Rehabilitation 16    Services. This program is administered by the Department 17    of Healthcare and Family Services. Day-to-day operations 18    are managed by the Department of Human Services' Division 19    of Rehabilitation Services. These services are offered for 20    individuals who are at risk of being placed in a nursing 21    facility for care due to functional limitations caused by 22    a brain injury.23        (3) Individuals are eligible for Brain Injury waivers   HB4787- 2 -LRB104 19788 KTG 33238 b1    if, among other requirements, they have an acquired brain 2    injury as documented by a physician or neurologist. This 3    includes traumatic brain injuries, infections, anoxia, 4    stroke, aneurysm, electrical injury, malignant or benign 5    tumors, neoplasm of the brain, and toxic encephalopathy.6        (4) Twenty-two states currently offer care in the 7    community funding options for adults with brain injury who 8    require residential supports and services.9        (5) Illinois does not currently offer reimbursement 10    for care to programs providing brain injury care services 11    for individuals over the age of 21. As a result, these 12    individuals must stop receiving care abruptly in their 13    current programs when they age out of eligibility for 14    reimbursement and must be transferred to a nursing home at 15    age 21, or transferred to another state that can seek 16    reimbursement from the State of Illinois for the provision 17    of services for this age group. This causes a disruption 18    in care and separation of families. Illinois Medicaid 19    funds are used to support these individuals in accessing 20    out-of-state care, resulting in funding going to 21    out-of-state providers and being paid at higher 22    out-of-state rates.23    (b) As used in this Section, "approved programs" includes 24programs authorized to provide care under the Medicaid Home 25and Community-Based Services Waiver program.26    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to   HB4787- 3 -LRB104 19788 KTG 33238 b1the contrary, on and after January 1, 2027, the following 2services shall be eligible for reimbursement at approved 3programs through the Brain Injury waiver for eligible 4individuals over the age of 21:5        (1) Case management.6        (2) Nursing services.7        (3) Medical oversight by consulting medical director.8        (4) Physical therapy.9        (5) Occupational therapy.10        (6) Speech language therapy.11        (7) Behavioral intervention and therapy.12        (8) Individual and family counseling.13        (9) Life skills training, including community 14    re-access training.15        (10) Residential habilitation.16        (11) Day habilitation.17    (d) The Department of Human Services shall reimburse 18approved programs at the rates in effect for the Home and 19Community-Based Services Waiver program most recently approved 20under authority of Section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act. 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 221, 2027.